South Dakota, session 2026, HB1107.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 43-25-18.3 be AMENDED:
43-25-18.3. If, upon the hearing in an action pursuant to § 43-25-18.1, it appears
to the satisfaction of the court that the allegations in the action are true and that, because
of changed conditions or circumstances since the execution of an instrument of
conveyance, it is impossible or impractical to continue to hold or use the lands for the
purpose set forth in the instrument, the court may:
(1) Enter a decree modifying, in whole or in part, any direction, limitation, or restriction
established by the grantor of the instrument, so that the real property may be
administered, managed, or pledged in any manner the court determines necessary
to effectively accomplish, as near as possible under existing conditions, the general
benevolent, charitable, educational, religious, or other public purpose set forth in
the instrument; or
(2) Authorize the grantee to sell the lands for the highest price obtainable, and direct
that the proceeds of the sale of the lands be reinvested in a manner consistent
with the purpose set forth in the original instrument.

26.614.10 2 1107
An Act to modify restrictions on lands for certain public purposes.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1107
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1107 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1107 ENROLLED